Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.040

Operation—Leasing.

Such cities are authorized to establish the method of operation of off-street parking space and/or facilities by ordinance, which may include leasing or municipal operation.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 221 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 204 s 13; 1965 c 7 s 35.86.040. Prior: 1959 c 302 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 221: See note following RCW 35.86.010.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 204: See note following RCW 35.86A.010.